grammar.foma
# Vowels
define V [ a | e | i | o | u ];

# Consonants
define C [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | r | s | t | f | x | w | z ];

read lexc english.lexc
define Lexicon;

# Consonant doubling: 1-letter consonant doubled before -ing/-ed/-er/-est (beg/begging)
define ConsonantDoubling g -> g g || V _ "^" [i n g | e d | e r | e s t ]   ,,
                         l -> l l || V _ "^" [i n g | e d | e r | e s t ]   ,,
                         t -> t t || V _ "^" [i n g | e d | e r | e s t ]   ,,
                         d -> d d || V _ "^" [i n g | e d | e r | e s t ]   ,,
                         b -> b b || V _ "^" [i n g | e d | e r | e s t ]   ,,
                         n -> n n || V _ "^" [i n g | e d | e r | e s t ]   ,,
                         m -> m m || V _ "^" [i n g | e d | e r | e s t ]   ,,
                         f -> f f || V _ "^" [i n g | e d | e r | e s t ]   ,,
                         z -> z z || V _ "^" [i n g | e d | e r | e s t ]   ,,
                         s -> s s || V _ "^" [i n g | e d | e r | e s t ]   ,,
                         r -> r r || V _ "^" [i n g | e d | e r | e s t ]   ,,
                         p -> p p || V _ "^" [i n g | e d | e r | e s t ]   ;

# Consonant doubling: 1-letter consonant doubled after vowel, before -ing/-ed/-er/-est (beg/begging)
# define ConsonantDoubling DC -> DC DC || V _ "^" [i n g | e d | e r | e s t] ;

# E deletion: silent e dropped before -ing and -ed (make/making)
define EDeletion e -> 0 || _ "^" [ i n g | e d ] ;

# E insertion: e added after -s, -z, -x, -ch, -sh before s (watch/watches)
define EInsertion [..] -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h _ "^" s ;

# Y replacement: after consonant -y changes to -ie before -s, -i before -ed (try/tries)
define YReplacement y -> i e || C _ "^" s    ,,
                    y -> i   || C _ "^" e d  ;

# F replacement: -f changes to -v before -s (knife/knives)
define FReplacement f -> v e || _ "^" s    ,,
                    f e -> v e || _ "^" s  ;

# ex replacement: -ex changes to -ice before -s (vertex/vertices)
define EXReplacement e x -> i c e || _ "^" s ;

# K insertion: verbs ending with vowel + -c add -k (panic/panicked)
define KInsertion [..] -> k || V c _ "^" [e d | i n g];

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

read lexc english.lexc
define Lexicon;

define Grammar Lexicon           .o.
               ConsonantDoubling .o.
               EDeletion         .o.
               EInsertion        .o.
               YReplacement      .o.
               FReplacement      .o.
               EXReplacement     .o.
               KInsertion        .o.
               Cleanup;

regex Grammar;
